Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 13.5
UNIFORM CHILD ABDUCTION PREVENTION ACT

Section

PREFATORY NOTE

Child abduction is a serious problem both in scope and effect. A study commissioned by the Office of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention estimated that 262,100 children were abducted in 1999; 203,900 (78 per cent) of them were abducted by a parent or family member; approximately 1000 of the abductions were international.

1

See David Finkelhor, Heather Hammer & Andrea J. Sedlak, National Incidence Studies of Missing, Abducted, Runaway, and Thrownaway Children, Children Abducted by Family Members: National Estimate and Characteristics (Oct. 2002).

The purpose of the Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act is to deter both predecree and postdecree domestic and international child abductions by parents, persons acting on behalf of a parent or others. Family abductions may be preventable through the identification of risk factors and the imposition of appropriate preventive measures.

The Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act is premised on the general principle that preventing an abduction is in a child's best interests. Abducted children may suffer long- lasting harm. Federal law recognizes that parental abduction is harmful to children.

2

International Child Abduction Remedies Act, 42 U.S.C. § 11601(a)(1) ("The Congress makes the following findings: (1) The international abduction or wrongful retention of children is harmful to their well-being . . . ").

See also Dorothy S. Huntington, Parental Kidnapping: A New Form of Child Abuse, available at

http://www.hiltonhouse.com/articles/child_abuse-huntington.txt

(characterizing child abduction as abuse).

Child abductions can occur before or after entry of a child-custody determination. This Act allows the court to impose abduction prevention measures at any time.

Many abductions occur before a court has had the opportunity to enter a child-custody determination. Children at the center of custody disputes are at the highest risk for potential abductions.

³America's Hidden Crime: When the Kidnapper is Kin 10-11 (Polly Klaas Foundation 2004).

See also Janet R. Johnston et al., Early Identification of Risk Factors for Parental Abduction (OJJDP March 2001) (indicating that men are more likely to abduct before an order is entered while women are more likely to abduct after a child custody determination).

Jurisdictional laws help deter abductions by specifying the proper state to handle custody litigation. The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act

&sup49 Unif. L. Ann. Part I 115 (1988).

sets out four concurrent bases for jurisdiction. Congress passed the Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act of 1980 to deter abductions, discourage interstate conflicts, and promote cooperation between states about custody matters by resolving jurisdictional conflicts.

&sup5Pub. L. No. 96-611, note 7 to 28 U.S.C. § 1738A.

The Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act prioritizes the state in which the child has lived for six months preceding the filing of the petition (the home state) as the place for custody litigation

&sup628 U.S.C. Section 1738A(c).

and prohibits a second state from assuming jurisdiction if there is an action pending in the state that has proper jurisdiction.

&sup728 U.S.C.A. Section 1738A(g).

The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act,

&sup89 Unif. L. Ann. Part I 657 (1999).

now in 45 jurisdictions, also prioritizes home state jurisdiction notwithstanding the child's absence. Jurisdictional laws do not provide prevention measures for abduction.

Post-decree abductions often occur because the existing child-custody determinations lack sufficient protective provisions to prevent an abduction. An award of joint physical custody without a designation of specific times; a vague order granting "reasonable visitation"; or the lack any restrictions on custody and visitation make orders hard to enforce. The awareness of abduction risk factors and preventive measures available can reduce the threat of abduction by giving the court the tools to make the initial child-custody determination clearer, more specific, and more easily enforceable.

If an abduction occurs after a child-custody determination, all states have enforcement remedies. Forty-six jurisdictions use the procedures in Article 3 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act. In addition, courts can punish abductors for contempt and allow tort actions for custodial interference. Several federal laws help locate missing children

&sup9Missing Children Act, 28 U.S.C. § 534 (1982); Missing Children Search Assistance Act and the National Child Search Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. § 5779 & § 5780 (1990); and the Prosecutorial Remedies and Other Tools to End the Exploitation of Children Today (PROTECT) Act of 2003, Pub. L. 108-21, 117 Stat. 650 (AMBER Alert Program).

and criminalize international parental kidnapping.

&sup10

See International Parental Kidnapping Crime Act (IPKCA), 18 U.S.C. § 1204; The Fugitive Felon Act, 18 U.S.C. § 1073; and The Extradition Treaties Interpretation Act of 1998, 18 U.S.C. § 3181.

While there is no federal law criminalizing interstate parental kidnapping, there is a mechanism for apprehending persons who violate state parental kidnapping laws and travel across state lines.

&sup11Unlawful Flight to Avoid Prosecution, 18 U.S.C. § 1204; The Fugitive Felon Act, 18 U.S.C. § 1073. When enacting the Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act, Congress declared that the Unlawful Flight to Avoid Prosecution provision applies to cases involving parental kidnapping and interstate or international flight to avoid prosecution. Pub. L. No. 96-611, 10(a).

While every state criminally forbids custodial interference by parents or relatives of the child, the laws differ as to the elements of the offenses, the punishments given, and whether a child-custody determination must exist for a violation to occur.

&sup12Appendix A. Citation List of State Parental Kidnapping Statutes, National Clearinghouse for the Defense of Battered Women, The Impact of Parental Kidnapping Laws and Practice on Domestic Violence Survivors 32 (2005).

If the abduction is international, the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction, currently in effect between the United States and fifty-five countries, facilitates the return of an abducted child to the child's habitual residence.

&sup13

See The Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction, 51 Fed. Reg. § 10494 et seq. (1986); the International Child Abduction Remedies Act (ICARA), 42 U.S.C. §§ 11601-11610. For a current list of United States treaty partners, visit www.travel.state.gov/family/abduction/hague_issues/hague_issues_1487.html.

Many countries, however, have not ratified the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction, the United States has not accepted all nations' accessions, and some countries that have ratified do not comply with the treaty obligations.

This Act is civil law and complements existing state law. This Act does not limit, contradict, or supercede the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act or the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act. This Act is not meant to prevent a legitimate relocation action filed in accordance with the law of the state having jurisdiction to make a child-custody determination nor to prevent a victim of domestic violence from escaping abuse.

The Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act applies to predecree and intrastate cases, to emergency situations, and to cases in which risk factors exist and the current child-custody determination lacks abduction prevention measures. Only three states have enacted comprehensive child abduction prevention statutes;

&sup14

See Ark. Stat. Ann. § 9-13-401-407 (2005); Cal. Fam. Code § 3048 (2004); Tex. Fam. Code § 153.501- § 153.503 (2003).

two other states include provisions to reduce the risk of abduction.

&sup15

See Fla. Stat. § 61.45 (2005); Or. Rev. Stat. § 109.035 (2005).

This Act will fill a void in the majority of states by identifying circumstances indicating a risk of abduction and providing measures to prevent the abduction of children, predecree or postdecree.

14-13.5-101. Short title.

This article may be cited as the "Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act".

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 767, § 1, effective May 14.

14-13.5-102. Definitions.

In this article:

"Abduction" means the wrongful removal or wrongful retention of a child.

"Child" means an unemancipated individual who is less than 18 years of age.

"Child-custody determination" means a judgment, decree, or other order of a court providing for the legal custody or physical custody of a child, allocating parental responsibilities with respect to a child, or providing for visitation or parenting time with respect to a child. The term includes a permanent, temporary, initial, and modification order. The term does not include an order relating to child support or other monetary obligation of an individual.

"Child-custody proceeding" means a proceeding in which the legal custody or physical custody of a child, the allocation of parental responsibilities with respect to a child, or visitation or parenting time with respect to a child is at issue. The term includes a proceeding for divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, neglect, abuse, dependency, guardianship, paternity, termination of parental rights, or protection from domestic violence or domestic abuse. The term does not include a proceeding involving juvenile delinquency or contractual emancipation.

"Court" means an entity authorized under the law of a state to establish, enforce, or modify a child-custody determination.

"Petition" includes a motion or its equivalent.

"Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe or nation.

"Travel document" means records relating to a travel itinerary, including travel tickets, passes, reservations for transportation, or accommodations. The term does not include a passport or visa.

"Wrongful removal" means the taking of a child that breaches rights of custody or orders concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities or breaches rights of visitation or parenting time given or recognized under the law of this state.

"Wrongful retention" means the keeping or concealing of a child that breaches rights of custody or orders concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities or breaches rights of visitation or parenting time given or recognized under the law of this state.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 767, § 1, effective May 14.

14-13.5-103. Cooperation and communication among courts.

Sections 14-13-110, 14-13-111, and 14-13-112 shall apply to cooperation and communications among courts in proceedings under this article.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 768, § 1, effective May 14.

14-13.5-104. Actions for abduction prevention measures.

A court on its own motion may order abduction prevention measures in a child-custody proceeding if the court finds that the evidence establishes a credible risk of abduction of the child.

A party to a child-custody determination or another individual or entity having a right under the law of this state or any other state to seek a child-custody determination for the child may file a petition seeking abduction prevention measures to protect the child under this article.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 768, § 1, effective May 14.

14-13.5-105. Jurisdiction.

A petition under this article 13.5 may be filed only in a court that has jurisdiction to make a child-custody determination with respect to the child at issue under the "Uniform Child-custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act", article 13 of this title 14. A court with jurisdiction to modify an order concerning the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities pursuant to this article 13.5 may exercise jurisdiction during the pendency of an appeal brought with respect to an order allocating parental rights and responsibilities.

A court of this state has temporary emergency jurisdiction under section 14-13-204, if the court finds a credible risk of abduction.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 769, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1031), ch. 116, p. 451, § 6, effective May 7.

Editor's note:

Section 8 of chapter 116 (HB 21-1031), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to any request to modify an order appealed on, after, or before May 7, 2021.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1031, see section 1 of chapter 116, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

14-13.5-106. Contents of petition.

A petition under this article must be verified and include a copy of any existing child-custody determination, if available. The petition must specify the risk factors for abduction, including the relevant factors described in section 14-13.5-107. Subject to section 14-13-209, if reasonably ascertainable, the petition must contain:

The name, date of birth, and gender of the child;

The customary address and current physical location of the child;

The identity, customary address, and current physical location of the respondent;

A statement of whether a prior action to prevent abduction, domestic violence, or domestic abuse has been filed by a party or other individual or entity having custody of the child, and the date, location, and disposition of the action;

A statement of whether a party to the proceeding has been arrested for a crime related to domestic violence, stalking, or child abuse or neglect and the date, location, and disposition of the case; and

Any other information required to be submitted to the court for a child-custody determination under section 14-13-209.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 769, § 1, effective May 14.

14-13.5-107. Factors to determine risk of abduction.

In determining whether there is a credible risk of abduction of a child, the court shall consider any evidence that the petitioner or respondent:

Has previously abducted or attempted to abduct the child;

Has threatened to abduct the child;

Has recently engaged in activities that may indicate a planned abduction, including:

Abandoning employment;

Selling a primary residence;

Terminating a lease;

Closing bank or other financial management accounts, liquidating assets, hiding or destroying financial documents, or conducting any unusual financial activities;

Applying for a passport or visa or obtaining travel documents for the respondent, a family member, or the child; or

Seeking to obtain the child's birth certificate or school or medical records;

Has engaged in domestic violence, domestic abuse, stalking, or child abuse or neglect;

Has refused to follow a child-custody determination;

Lacks strong familial, financial, emotional, or cultural ties to the state or the United States;

Has strong familial, financial, emotional, or cultural ties to another state or country;

Is likely to take the child to a country that:

Is not a party to the "Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction" and does not provide for the extradition of an abducting parent or for the return of an abducted child;

Is a party to the "Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction" but:

The "Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction" is not in force between the United States and that country;

Is noncompliant according to the most recent compliance report issued by the United States department of state; or

Lacks legal mechanisms for immediately and effectively enforcing a return order under the "Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction";

Poses a risk that the child's physical or emotional health or safety would be endangered in the country because of specific circumstances relating to the child or because of human rights violations committed against children;

Has laws or practices that would:

Enable the respondent, without due cause, to prevent the petitioner from contacting the child;

Restrict the petitioner from freely traveling to or exiting from the country because of the petitioner's gender, nationality, marital status, or religion; or

Restrict the child's ability legally to leave the country after the child reaches the age of majority because of a child's gender, nationality, or religion;

Is included by the United States department of state on a current list of state sponsors of terrorism;

Does not have an official United States diplomatic presence in the country; or

Is engaged in active military action or war, including a civil war, to which the child may be exposed;

Is undergoing a change in immigration or citizenship status that would adversely affect the respondent's ability to remain in the United States legally;

Has had an application for United States citizenship denied;

Has forged or presented misleading or false evidence on government forms or supporting documents to obtain or attempt to obtain a passport, a visa, travel documents, a social security card, a driver's license, or other government-issued identification card or has made a misrepresentation to the United States government;

Has used multiple names to attempt to mislead or defraud; or

Has engaged in any other conduct the court considers relevant to the risk of abduction.

In the hearing on a petition under this article, the court shall consider any evidence that the respondent believed in good faith that the respondent's conduct was necessary to avoid imminent harm to the child or respondent and any other evidence that may be relevant to whether the respondent may be permitted to remove or retain the child.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 769, § 1, effective May 14.

14-13.5-108. Provisions and measures to prevent abduction.

If a petition is filed under this article, the court may enter an order that must include:

The basis for the court's exercise of jurisdiction;

The manner in which notice and opportunity to be heard were given to the persons entitled to notice of the proceeding;

A detailed description of each party's custody and visitation rights, residential arrangements for the child, and any child-custody determinations in effect;

A provision stating that a violation of the order may subject the party in violation to civil and criminal penalties; and

Identification of the child's country of habitual residence at the time of the issuance of the order.

If, at a hearing on a petition under this article or on the court's own motion, the court after reviewing the evidence finds a credible risk of abduction of the child, the court shall enter an abduction prevention order. The order must include the provisions required by subsection (1) of this section and measures and conditions, including those in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section, that are reasonably calculated to prevent abduction of the child, giving due consideration to the custody and visitation rights of the parties and the child-custody determinations in effect at the time of the filing of the petition under this article. The court shall consider the age of the child, the potential harm to the child from an abduction, the legal and practical difficulties of returning the child to the jurisdiction if abducted, and the reasons for the potential abduction, including evidence of domestic violence, domestic abuse, stalking, or child abuse or neglect.

An abduction prevention order may include one or more of the following:

An imposition of travel restrictions that require that a party traveling with the child outside a designated geographical area provide the other party with the following:

The travel itinerary of the child;

A list of physical addresses and telephone numbers at which the child can be reached at specified times; and

Copies of all travel documents;

A prohibition of the respondent directly or indirectly from:

Removing the child from this state, the United States, or another geographic area without permission of the court or the petitioner's written consent;

Removing or retaining the child in violation of a child-custody determination;

Removing the child from school or a child-care or similar facility; or

Approaching the child at any location other than a site designated for supervised visitation or supervised parenting time;

A requirement that a party register the order in another state as a prerequisite to allowing the child to travel to that state;

With regard to the child's passport:

A direction that the petitioner place the child's name in the United States department of state's child passport issuance alert program;

A requirement that the respondent surrender to the court or the petitioner's attorney any United States or foreign passport issued in the child's name, including a passport issued in the name of both the parent and the child; and

A prohibition upon the respondent from applying on behalf of the child for a new or replacement passport or visa;

As a prerequisite to exercising custody, parental responsibilities, or visitation or parenting time, a requirement that the respondent provide:

To the United States department of state office of children's issues and the relevant foreign consulate or embassy, an authenticated copy of the order detailing passport and travel restrictions for the child;

To the court:

Proof that the respondent has provided the information in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (e); and

An acknowledgment in a record from the relevant foreign consulate or embassy that no passport application has been made, or passport issued, on behalf of the child;

To the petitioner, proof of registration with the United States embassy or other United States diplomatic presence in the destination country and with the central authority for the "Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction", if that convention is in effect between the United States and the destination country, unless one of the parties objects; and

A written waiver under the federal "Privacy Act of 1974", 5 U.S.C. Section 552a, with respect to any document, application, or other information pertaining to the child authorizing its disclosure to the court and the petitioner; and

Upon the petitioner's request, a requirement that the respondent obtain an order from the relevant foreign country containing terms identical to the child-custody determination issued in the United States.

In an abduction prevention order, the court may impose conditions on the exercise of custody, parental responsibilities, or visitation or parenting time that:

Limit visitation or parenting time or require that visitation or parenting time with the child by the respondent be supervised until the court finds that supervision is no longer necessary and order the respondent to pay the costs of supervision;

Require the respondent to post a bond or provide other security in an amount sufficient to serve as a financial deterrent to abduction, the proceeds of which may be used to pay for the reasonable expenses of recovery of the child, including reasonable attorneys fees and costs if there is an abduction; and

Require the respondent to obtain education on the potentially harmful effects to the child from abduction.

To prevent imminent abduction of a child, a court may:

Issue a warrant to take physical custody of the child under section 14-13.5-109 or the law of this state other than this article;

Direct the use of law enforcement to take any action reasonably necessary to locate the child, obtain return of the child, or enforce a custody determination under this article or the law of this state other than this article; or

Grant any other relief allowed under the law of this state other than this article.

The remedies provided in this article are cumulative and do not affect the availability of other remedies to prevent abduction.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 771, § 1, effective May 14.

14-13.5-109. Warrant to take physical custody of child.

If a petition under this article contains allegations, and the court finds that there is a credible risk that the child is imminently likely to be wrongfully removed, the court may issue an ex parte warrant to take physical custody of the child.

The respondent on a petition under subsection (1) of this section must be afforded an opportunity to be heard at the earliest possible time after the ex parte warrant is executed, but not later than the next judicial day unless a hearing on that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible.

An ex parte warrant under subsection (1) of this section to take physical custody of a child must:

Recite the facts upon which a determination of a credible risk of imminent wrongful removal of the child is based;

Direct law enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child immediately;

State the date and time for the hearing on the petition; and

Provide for the safe interim placement of the child pending further order of the court.

If feasible, before issuing a warrant and before determining the placement of the child after the warrant is executed, the court may order a search of the relevant databases of the national crime information center system and similar state databases to determine if either the petitioner or respondent has a history of domestic violence, stalking, or child abuse or neglect.

The petition and warrant must be served on the respondent when or immediately after the child is taken into physical custody.

A warrant to take physical custody of a child, issued by this state or another state, is enforceable throughout this state. If the court finds that a less intrusive remedy will not be effective, it may authorize law enforcement officers to enter private property to take physical custody of the child. If required by exigent circumstances, the court may authorize law enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any hour.

If the court finds, after a hearing, that a petitioner sought an ex parte warrant under subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of harassment or in bad faith, the court may award the respondent reasonable attorneys fees, costs, and expenses.

This article does not affect the availability of relief allowed under the law of this state other than this article.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 774, § 1, effective May 14.

14-13.5-110. Duration of abduction prevention order.

An abduction prevention order remains in effect until the earliest of:

The time stated in the order;

The emancipation of the child;

The child's attaining eighteen years of age; or

The time the order is modified, revoked, vacated, or superseded by a court with jurisdiction under sections 14-13-201 to 14-13-203.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 775, § 1, effective May 14.

14-13.5-111. Uniformity of applications and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 775, § 1, effective May 14.

14-13.5-112. Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This article modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal "Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001, et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of the act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001(c), of that act or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7003(b).

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 775, § 1, effective May 14.